North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 20. North Carolina State Ports Authority.

§ 136-260.
Creation of Authority — membership; appointment, terms and vacancies; officers; meetings and quorum; compensation.

The North Carolina State Ports Authority is hereby created within the Department of Transportation and shall be subject to and under the direct supervision of the Secretary of Transportation. It shall be governed by a board composed of nine members and hereby designated as the Authority. Effective July 1, 1983, it shall be governed by a board composed of 11 members and hereby designated as the Authority. The General Assembly suggests and recommends that no person be appointed to the Authority who is domiciled in the district of the North Carolina House of Representatives or the North Carolina Senate in which a State port is located. Members of the North Carolina Board of Transportation may be appointed to the Authority. The Governor shall appoint seven members to the Authority, and the General Assembly shall appoint two members of the Authority. Effective July 1, 1983, the Authority shall consist of seven persons appointed by the Governor, and four persons appointed by the General Assembly. Effective July 1, 2011, the Governor shall appoint six members to the Authority, in addition to the Secretary of Transportation, who shall serve as a voting member of the Authority by virtue of his office. The Secretary of Transportation shall fill the first vacancy occurring after July 1, 2011, in a position on the Authority over which the Governor has appointive power.

The initial appointments by the Governor shall be made on or after March 8, 1977, two terms to expire July 1, 1979; two terms to expire July 1, 1981; and three terms to expire July 1, 1983. Thereafter, at the expiration of each stipulated term of office all appointments made by the Governor shall be for a term of six years.

To stagger further the terms of members:

Of the members appointed by the Governor to replace the members whose terms expire on July 1, 1991, one member shall be appointed to a term of five years, to expire on June 30, 1996; the other member shall be appointed for a term of six years, to expire on June 30, 1997;

Of the members appointed by the Governor to replace the members whose terms expire on July 1, 1993, one member shall be appointed to a term of five years, to expire on June 30, 1998; the other member shall be appointed to a term of six years, to expire on June 30, 1999;

Of those members appointed by the Governor to replace the members whose terms expire on July 1, 1995, one member shall be appointed to a term of five years, to expire on June 30, 2000; the other member shall be appointed to a term of six years, to expire on June 30, 2001.

Thereafter, at the expiration of each stipulated term of office all appointments made by the governor shall be for a term of six years.

The members of the Authority appointed by the Governor shall be selected from the State-at-large and insofar as practicable shall represent each section of the State in all of the business, agriculture, and industrial interests of the State. At least one member appointed by the Governor shall be affiliated with a major exporter or importer currently using the State Ports. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Authority appointed by the Governor shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. The Governor may remove a member appointed by the Governor only for reasons provided by

G.S. 143B-13

.

The General Assembly shall appoint two persons to serve terms expiring June 30, 1983. The General Assembly shall appoint four persons to serve terms beginning July 1, 1983, to serve until June 30, 1985, and successors shall serve for two-year terms. Of the two appointments to be made in 1982, one shall be made upon the recommendation of the Speaker, and one shall be made upon the recommendation of the President of the Senate. Of the four appointments made in 1983 and biennially thereafter, two shall be made upon the recommendation of the President of the Senate, and two shall be made upon the recommendation of the Speaker. To stagger further the terms of members:

Of the members appointed upon the recommendation of the Speaker to replace the members whose terms expire on June 30, 1991, one member shall be appointed to a term of one year, to expire on June 30, 1992; the other member shall be appointed to a term of two years, to expire on June 30, 1993;

Of the members appointed upon the recommendation of the President of the Senate to replace the members whose terms expire on June 30, 1991, one member shall be appointed to a term of one year, to expire on June 30, 1992; the other member shall be appointed to a term of two years, to expire on June 30, 1993. Successors to these persons for terms beginning on or after January 1, 1997, shall be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

Thereafter, at the expiration of each stipulated term of office all appointments made by the General Assembly shall be for terms of two years.

Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

, and vacancies in those appointments shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Members appointed by the General Assembly may be removed only for reasons provided by

G.S. 143B-13

.

The Governor shall appoint from the members of the Authority the chairman and vice-chairman of the Authority. The members of the Authority shall appoint a treasurer and secretary of the Authority.

The Authority shall meet once in each 60 days at such regular meeting time as the Authority by rule may provide and at any place within the State as the Authority may provide, and shall also meet upon the call of its chairman or a majority of its members. A majority of its members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The members of the Authority shall not be entitled to compensation for their services, but they shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expense in accordance with

G.S. 138-5

. No member of the Authority may participate in any discussion or vote on any matter before the Authority on which the member has a conflict of interest.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 1; 1949, c. 892, s. 1; 1953, c. 191, s. 1; 1959, c. 523, s. 1; 1961, c. 242; 1975, c. 716, s. 2; 1977, c. 65, s. 1; c. 198, s. 9; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, ss. 69-71; 1983, c. 717, s. 2.1; 1989, c. 273, s. 2; c. 751, s. 8(25); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1072; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 70; 1995, c. 490, s. 54; 1997-235, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b), (h).

State Government Reorganization.

The State Ports Authority was transferred to the Department of Transportation and Highway Safety (now Department of Transportation) by former G.S. 143A-107, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864, and repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 716, s. 5. For present provisions as to the Department of Transportation, see

G.S. 143B-345

et seq.

§ 136-261.
Purposes of Authority.

Through the Authority hereinbefore created, the State of North Carolina may engage in promoting, developing, constructing, equipping, maintaining and operating the harbors and seaports within the State, or within the jurisdiction of the State, and works of internal improvements incident thereto, including the acquisition or construction, maintenance and operation at such seaports or harbors of watercraft and highways and bridges thereon or essential for the proper operation thereof. Said Authority is created as an instrumentality of the State of North Carolina for the accomplishment of the following general purposes:

To develop and improve the harbors or seaports at Wilmington, Morehead City and Southport, North Carolina, and such other places, including inland ports and facilities, as may be deemed feasible for a more expeditious and efficient handling of waterborne commerce from and to any place or places in the State of North Carolina and other states and foreign countries.

To acquire, construct, equip, maintain, develop and improve the port facilities at said ports and to improve such portions of the waterways thereat as are within the jurisdiction of the federal government.

To foster and stimulate the shipment of freight and commerce through said ports, whether originating within or without the State of North Carolina, including the investigation and handling of matters pertaining to all transportation rates and rate structures affecting the same.

To cooperate with the United States of America and any agency, department, corporation or instrumentality thereof in the maintenance, development, improvement and use of said harbors and seaports in connection with and in furtherance of the war operations and needs of the United States.

To accept funds from any of said counties or cities wherein said ports are located and to use the same in such manner, within the purposes of said Authority, as shall be stipulated by the said county or city, and to act as agent or instrumentality, of any of said counties or cities in any matter coming within the general purposes of said Authority.

To act as agent for the United States of America, or any agency, department, corporation or instrumentality thereof, in any matter coming within the purposes or powers of the Authority.

And in general to do and perform any act or function which may tend or be useful toward the development and improvement of harbors, seaports and inland ports of the State of North Carolina, and to increase the movement of waterborne commerce, foreign and domestic, to, through, and from such harbors and ports.

The enumeration of the above purposes shall not limit or circumscribe the broad objective of developing to the utmost the port possibilities of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 2; 1953, c. 191, ss. 3, 4; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1979, c. 159, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-262.
Powers of Authority.

In order to enable it to carry out the purposes of this Article, the said Authority shall:

Have the powers of a body corporate, including the power to sue and be sued, to make contracts, and to adopt and use a common seal and to alter the same as may be deemed expedient;

Have the authority to make all necessary contracts and arrangements with other port authorities of this and other states for the interchange of business, and for such other purposes as will facilitate and increase the business of the North Carolina State Ports Authority;

Be authorized and empowered to rent, lease, buy, own, acquire, mortgage, otherwise encumber, and dispose of such property, real or personal, as said Authority may deem proper to carry out the purposes and provisions of this Article, all or any of them;

Be authorized and empowered to acquire, construct, maintain, equip and operate any wharves, docks, piers, quays, elevators, compresses, refrigeration storage plants, warehouses and other structures, and any and all facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, including the dredging of approaches thereto, and the construction of beltline roads and highways and bridges and causeways thereon, and other bridges and causeways necessary or useful in connection therewith, and shipyards, shipping facilities, and transportation facilities incident thereto and useful or convenient for the use thereof, and to acquire, construct, and maintain, but not operate, such rail facilities as may be necessary or useful in connection with the operation of the State Ports, provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as requiring or allowing the North Carolina State Ports Authority to become a carrier by rail subject to the federal laws regulating those carriers;

The Authority shall appoint an Executive Director, whose salary shall be fixed by the Authority, to serve at its pleasure. The Executive Director or his designee shall appoint, employ, dismiss and, within the limits of available funding, fix the compensation of such other employees as he deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article. There shall be an executive committee consisting of the chairman of the Authority and two other members elected annually by the Authority. The executive committee shall be vested with authority to do all acts which are authorized by the bylaws of the Authority. Members of the executive committee shall serve until their successors are elected;

Establish an office for the transaction of its business at such place or places as, in the opinion of the Authority, shall be advisable or necessary in carrying out the purposes of this Article;

Be authorized and empowered to create and operate such agencies and departments as said board may deem necessary or useful for the furtherance of any of the purposes of this Article;

Be authorized and empowered to pay all necessary costs and expenses involved in and incident to the formation and organization of said Authority, and incident to the administration and operation thereof, and to pay all other costs and expenses reasonably necessary or expedient in carrying out and accomplishing the purposes of this Article;

Be authorized and empowered to apply for and accept loans and grants of money from any federal agency or the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision thereof or from any public or private sources available for any and all of the purposes authorized in this Article, and to expend the same in accordance with the directions and requirements attached thereto, or imposed thereon by any such federal agency, the State of North Carolina, or any political subdivision thereof, or any public or private lender or donor, and to give such evidences of indebtedness as shall be required, provided, however, that no indebtedness of any kind incurred or created by the Authority shall constitute an indebtedness of the State of North Carolina, or any political subdivision thereof, and no such indebtedness shall involve or be secured by the faith, credit or taxing power of the State of North Carolina, or any political subdivision thereof;

Be authorized and empowered to act as agent for the United States of America, or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any matter coming within the purposes or powers of the Authority;

Have power to adopt, alter or repeal its own bylaws, rules and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed, and may provide for the appointment of such committees, and the functions thereof, as the Authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business. The Authority may establish fees for its services. In establishing these fees, the Authority shall consider the cost of providing service, revenue requirements, the cost of similar services at other seaports in the South Atlantic region, and any other factors it considers relevant. The Authority shall report the establishment or increase of any fee to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations no later than 30 business days after it establishes or increases the fee.

Be authorized and empowered to do any and all other acts and things in this Article authorized or required to be done, whether or not included in the general powers in this section mentioned; and

Be authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary to accomplish the purposes of this Article: Provided, that said Authority shall not engage in shipbuilding.The property of the Authority shall not be subject to any taxes or assessments thereon.

In order to execute the powers enumerated in subsection (a), the Authority shall determine the policies of the North Carolina State Ports Authority by majority vote of all members of the Authority present and voting. Once a policy is determined, the Authority shall communicate it to the Executive Director, who shall have the sole and exclusive authority to execute the policy of the Authority. No member of the Authority shall have responsibility or authority to give operational directives to any employee of the North Carolina State Ports Authority other than the Executive Director.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 3; 1949, c. 892, s. 2; 1953, c. 191, s. 5; 1959, c. 523, ss. 3-5; 1975, c. 716, s. 2; 1977, c. 65, s. 2; c. 198, ss. 7, 9; c. 802, s. 50.45; 1979, c. 159, s. 3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1181, s. 2; 1983, c. 717, s. 84; 1985, c. 479, s. 219; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 102, 103; 1987, c. 275, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 273, s. 1; 2002-99, s. 7(a); 2002-126, s. 6.6(c); 2006-203, s. 109; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b), (k).

§ 136-263.
Container shipping.

The State Ports Authority shall provide at the ports of Morehead City and Wilmington adequate equipment and facilities including container cranes at each port as needed, in order to maintain existing and future levels of containerized cargo shipping at both ports and provide and encourage growth in handling of containerized cargoes at both ports.

History.

1979, c. 934; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-264.
Approval of acquisition and disposition of real property.

Any transactions relating to the acquisition or disposition of real property or any estate or interest in real property, by the North Carolina State Ports Authority, shall be subject to prior review by the Governor and Council of State, and shall become effective only after the same has been approved by the Governor and Council of State. Upon the acquisition of real property or other estate therein, by the North Carolina State Ports Authority, the fee title or other estate shall vest in and the instrument of conveyance shall name the “North Carolina State Ports Authority” as grantee, lessee, or transferee. Upon the disposition of real property or any interest or estate therein, the instrument of conveyance or transfer shall be executed by the North Carolina State Ports Authority. The approval of any transaction by the Governor and Council of State may be evidenced by a duly certified copy of excerpt of minutes of the meeting of the Governor and Council of State, attested by the private secretary to the Governor or the Governor, reciting such approval, affixed to the instrument of acquisition or transfer, and said certificate may be recorded as a part thereof, and the same shall be conclusive evidence of review and approval of the subject transaction by the Governor and Council of State. The Governor, acting with the approval of the Council of State, may delegate the review and approval of such classes of lease, rental, easement, or right-of-way transactions as he deems advisable, and he may likewise delegate the review and approval of the severance of buildings and timber from the land.

History.

1959, c. 523, s. 6; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-265.
Issuance of bonds and notes.

As a means of raising the funds needed from time to time in the acquisition, construction, equipment, maintenance or operation of any facility, building, structure or any other matter or thing which the Authority is authorized to acquire, construct, equip, maintain, or operate, all or any of them, including authorized special user projects, the Authority is hereby authorized, at one time or from time to time, to borrow money and in evidence thereof to issue bonds, notes and other obligations of the Authority as provided in this Article. Bonds, notes and other obligations may also be issued to (i) establish such reserves as the Authority may determine to be desirable including, without limitation, a debt service reserve fund, and (ii) provide for interest during the estimated period of construction and for a reasonable period thereafter and to provide for working capital.The principal of and the interest on such bonds or notes shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for such payment. Any such notes may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, such notes may be paid from any available revenues, income or assets of the Authority. The bonds or notes of each issue shall be dated and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the Authority at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the Authority. Any such bonds or notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates, including variable rates, as may be determined by the Authority. Such bonds or notes shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 40 years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Authority.

Prior to the sale and delivery of any bonds or notes by the Authority, the Governor shall approve the general purposes of and the general security provisions for any such bonds or notes. Such bonds or notes may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as the Authority shall determine. Bonds or notes may be issued under the provisions of this Article without obtaining, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Article, the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Article and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes or the trust agreement securing the same.

In the discretion of the Authority any obligations issued under the provisions of this Article may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State and, in the case of an authorized special user project, a deed of trust of which the trustee may be an individual who is a resident of the State. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depository of the proceeds of obligations, revenues or other money under this Article to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. The pledge of any assets, income or revenues of the Authority to the payment of the principal of or the interest on any obligations of the Authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made and any such assets, income or revenues shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.

The resolution authorizing any obligations or the trust agreement securing the same may provide that any moneys held pursuant thereto may be temporarily invested pending the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this Article and such resolution or trust agreement may provide. Any such moneys or any other moneys of the Authority may be invested as provided in

G.S. 159-30

or any successor provision thereof.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this Article are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes or obligations of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

The Authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this Article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations and, if deemed advisable by the Authority, for any corporate purpose of the Authority. The issuance of such obligations, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the Authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this Article which relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.Refunding obligations may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this Article and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such outstanding obligations.

Any obligations issued by the Authority under the provisions of this Article shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the State, excepting inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the obligations, and franchise taxes. The interest on the obligations is not subject to taxation as income.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this Article shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the State or of any other public body in the State secured by a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any other public body in the State, respectively, but shall be payable solely from the revenues, income or assets of the Authority pledged thereto. Each obligation issued under this Article shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Authority shall not be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from the revenues, income or assets pledged therefor and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any other public body in the State is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligation.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 4; 1975, c. 716, s. 2; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1979, c. 159, s. 4; 1981, c. 856, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1181, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 104, 105; 1987, c. 275, s. 3; 1995, c. 46, s. 16; 2006-203, s. 110; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b), (k).

§ 136-266.
Bonds and notes for special user projects.

The Authority is also hereby authorized, subject to the provisions of this section, to issue, at one time or from time to time, bonds and notes to finance special user projects. The term “special user project” shall mean any land, equipment or any one or more buildings or other structures, whether or not on the same site or sites, and any rehabilitation, improvement, renovation or enlargement of, or any addition to, any building or structure for use as or in connection with any commercial, industrial, manufacturing, processing, mining, transportation, distribution, storage, marine or environmental facility or improvement primarily for the use of one or more private parties. Any such special user project may include all appurtenances and incidental facilities such as land, headquarters or office facilities, restaurant and lodging facilities, warehouses, distribution centers, pollution control facilities, access roads, sidewalks, utilities, railway sidings, trucking and similar facilities, parking facilities, waterways, docks, wharves and other improvements necessary or convenient for ships, tugboats, barges or other vessels or for the construction, maintenance and operation of any building or structure, or addition thereto.

Bonds and notes may be sold to finance special user projects irrespective of the interest limitations set forth in

G.S. 24-1.1

, as amended, and successor provisions.

The bonds or notes of each issue of the Authority under this section shall be special, limited obligations of the Authority payable solely from such other revenues, income or assets of the Authority as the Authority shall specifically assign or pledge and such funds, collateral and undertakings as any private parties may assign or pledge therefor.The financing agreement may provide the Authority with rights and remedies in the event of a default by the obligor thereunder including, without limitation, reentry and repossession or leasing or sale or foreclosure of the special user project to others.The Authority’s interest in a special user project may be that of owner, lessor, operator, lessee, conditional or installment vendor, mortgagor, mortgagee, secured party or otherwise, but the Authority need not have any ownership or possessory interest in the project, and if that of lessor, the lessee may have an option or an obligation to purchase the special user project upon the expiration or termination of the lease.

Bonds and notes issued under the provisions of this section may be secured by one or more agreements, including forecloseable deeds of trust and other trust instruments, which may pledge and assign to the trustee or the holders of its obligations the assets, revenues, and income provided for the security of the bonds or notes, including proceeds from the sale of any special user project, or part thereof, insurance proceeds and condemnation awards, and third-party agreements, and may convey or mortgage the project and other property and collateral to secure a bond issue.The Authority may subordinate the bonds or notes or its rights, assets, revenues and income derived from any special user project to any prior, contemporaneous or future securities or obligations or lien, mortgage or other security interest.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Authority may agree that all contracts relating to the acquisition, construction, installation and equipping of the special user project shall be solicited, negotiated, awarded and executed by the private party or parties for which the Authority is financing the special user project or their agents subject only to such approvals by the Authority as the Authority may require. The Authority may, out of the proceeds of bonds or notes, make advances to or reimburse such private parties or such agents for all or a portion of the costs incurred in connection with such contracts. The provisions of

G.S. 136-271

of this Article shall have no application to funds and moneys derived pursuant to this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-218, s. 5, effective July 1, 2001.

History.

1981, c. 856, s. 2; 2000-169, s. 41; 2001-218, s. 5; 2001-487, s. 33; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b), (k).

§ 136-267.
Power of eminent domain.

For the acquiring of rights-of-way and property necessary for the construction of structures, including railroad crossings, airports, seaplane bases, naval bases, wharves, piers, ships, docks, quays, elevators, compresses, refrigerator storage plants, warehouses and other riparian and littoral terminals and structures and approaches thereto and transportation facilities needful for the convenient use of same, and belt line roads and highways and causeways and bridges and other bridges and causeways, the Authority shall have the right and power to acquire the same by purchase, by negotiation, or by condemnation, and should it elect to exercise the right of eminent domain, condemnation proceedings shall be maintained by and in the name of the Authority, and it may proceed in the manner provided by the general laws of the State of North Carolina for the procedure by any county, municipality or authority organized under the laws of this State, or by the Board of Transportation, or in any other manner provided by law, as the Authority may, in its discretion, elect. The power of eminent domain shall not apply to property of persons, State agency or corporations already devoted to public use.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 5; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1979, c. 159, s. 5; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-268.
Exchange of property; removal of buildings, etc.

The Authority may exchange any property or properties acquired under the authority of this Chapter for other property, or properties usable in carrying out the powers hereby conferred, and also may remove from lands needed for its purposes and reconstruct on other locations, buildings, terminals, or other structures, upon the payment of just compensation, if in its judgment, it is necessary or expedient so to do in order to carry out any of its plans for port development, under the authorization of this Article.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 6; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1979, c. 159, s. 6; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-269.
Jurisdiction of the Authority; application of Chapter 20; appointment and authority of special police.

The jurisdiction of the Authority in any of said harbors or seaports within the State shall extend to all properties owned by or under control of the Authority and shall also extend over the waters and shores of such harbors or seaports and over that part of all tributary streams flowing into such harbors or seaports in which the tide ebbs and flows, and shall extend to the outer edge of the outer bar at such harbors or seaports.

All the provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes relating to the use of the highways of the State and the operation of motor vehicles thereon are hereby made applicable to the streets, alleys and driveways on the properties owned by or under the control of the North Carolina State Ports Authority. Any person violating any of the provisions of said Chapter in or on such streets, alleys or driveways shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as therein prescribed. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as in any way interfering with the ownership and control of such streets, alleys and driveways on the properties of said Authority as is now vested by law in the said Authority.

The North Carolina State Ports Authority is hereby authorized to make such reasonable rules, regulations, and adopt such additional ordinances with respect to the use of the streets, alleys, driveways and to the establishment of parking areas on the properties of the Authority and relating to the safety and welfare of persons using the property of the Authority. All rules, regulations and ordinances adopted pursuant to the authority of this subsection shall be recorded in the proceedings of the Authority and printed and copy of such rules, regulations and ordinances shall be filed in the office of the Attorney General of North Carolina and the Authority shall cause to be posted, at appropriate places on the properties of the Authority, notice to the public of applicable rules, regulations and ordinances as may be adopted under the authority of this subsection. Any person violating any such rules, regulations or ordinances shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

The Executive Director of the Authority is authorized to appoint such number of employees of the Authority as he may think proper as special policemen, who, when so appointed, shall have all the powers of policemen of incorporated towns. Such policemen shall have the power of arrest of persons committing violations of State law or any reasonable rules, regulations and ordinances lawfully adopted by the Authority as herein authorized. Employees appointed as such special policemen shall take the general oath of office prescribed by

G.S. 11-11

.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 9; 1959, c. 523, s. 7; 1965, c. 1074; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 83; 1977, c. 198, ss. 8, 9; 1987, c. 275, s. 5; 1993, c. 539, s. 1041; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-270.
Treasurer of the Authority.

The Authority shall select its own treasurer. The Authority shall require a surety bond of such appointee in such amount as the Authority may fix, and the premium or premiums thereon shall be paid by said Authority as a necessary expense of said Authority.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 10; 1959, c. 523, s. 8; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-271.
Deposit and disbursement of funds.

All Authority funds shall be deposited in a bank or banks to be designated by the Authority. Funds of the Authority shall be paid out only upon warrants signed by the treasurer or assistant treasurer of the Authority and countersigned by the chairman, the acting chairman or the executive director. No warrants shall be drawn or issued disbursing any of the funds of the Authority except for a purpose authorized by this Article and only when the account or expenditure for which the same is to be given in payment has been audited and approved by the Authority or its executive director.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 11; 1951, c. 1088, s. 1; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1981, c. 856, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-272.
Audit.

The operations of the State Ports Authority shall be subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes. The State Ports Authority shall reimburse the State Auditor the cost of any audit.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 12; 1951, c. 1088, s. 2; 1957, c. 269, s. 1; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1983, c. 913, s. 43; 2010-31, s. 21.2; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-273.
Purchase of supplies, material and equipment and building contracts.

All of the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes relating to the purchase of supplies, material and equipment by the State government are hereby made applicable to the North Carolina State Ports Authority.

All of the provisions of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes relating to public building contracts are hereby made applicable to the North Carolina State Ports Authority for those construction projects which may be funded, in whole or in part, by appropriations from the General Assembly.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, if the North Carolina State Ports Authority finds that the delivery of a particular port facility must be expedited for good cause, the Authority shall be exempt from the following statutes, and rules implementing those statutes, to the extent necessary to expedite delivery:

G.S. 133-1.1(g)

,

G.S. 143-128(a)

through (e),

G.S. 143-132

, and

G.S. 143-135.26

. Prior to exercising an exemption authorized under this subsection, the North Carolina State Ports Authority, through its Executive Director, shall give notice in writing of the Authority’s intent to exercise the exemption to the Secretary of Administration. The notice shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (i) the specific statutory requirement or requirements from which the Authority intends to exercise an exemption; (ii) the reason the exemption is necessary to expedite delivery of a port facility; and (iii) the way the Authority anticipates the exemption will expedite the delivery of a port facility. The Authority shall report quarterly to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on any building contracts exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to which an exemption authorized by this subsection is applied.

History.

1953, c. 191, s. 6; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 1987, c. 275, s. 6; 1997-331, s. 1; 1999-368, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).